Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 3
ORGANIZATION

32-1-301. Petition for organization.

After approval of the service plan pursuant to section 32-1-205 or 32-1-206 or after approval of the petition by the governing body of a municipality pursuant to section 32-1-205, the persons proposing the organization of a special district may file a petition for organization in the district court vested with jurisdiction of the county in which all or part of the real property in the proposed special district is situated. The petition shall be signed by not less than thirty percent or two hundred of the taxpaying electors of the proposed special district, whichever number is smaller. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only those signatures obtained after the approval of the service plan pursuant to section 32-1-205 or 32-1-206 or after approval of the petition by the governing body of a municipality pursuant to section 32-1-205 shall be considered by the district court in making the evidentiary finding concerning the required number of taxpaying electors of the proposed special district that is required by section 32-1-305 (1).

The petition shall set forth:

The type of service to be provided by the proposed special district and the name of the proposed special district, consisting of a chosen name preceding one of the following phrases:

Ambulance district;

(I.1) Fire protection district;

Health service district;

Metropolitan district;

Park and recreation district;

Sanitation district;

Water and sanitation district;

Water district;

Tunnel district;

Mental health-care service district;

Health assurance district;

Early childhood development service district.

A general description of the facilities and improvements, if any, to be constructed, installed, or purchased for the special district;

A statement as to whether the proposed special district lies wholly or partly within another special district or municipality;

The estimated cost of the proposed facilities and improvements;

The estimated property tax revenues for the district's first budget year;

A general description of the boundaries of the special district or the territory to be included therein, with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his property is within the special district;

If selected by the petitioners, a general description of the boundaries of director districts which shall have, as nearly as possible, the same number of eligible electors, which shall be as contiguous and compact as possible, and which shall be represented on the board by a director who is an eligible elector within the boundaries of the respective director district;

A request for the organization of the special district;

A request for the submission to the electors of the special district at the organizational election of any questions permitted to be submitted at such election pursuant to section 32-1-803.5.

The petition shall be accompanied by a resolution approving the service plan as provided in section 32-1-205, unless the service plan has been approved by the court as provided in section 32-1-206 or unless such special district is confined exclusively within the boundaries of any existing municipality, and the governing body of the municipality has approved the petition for organization by resolution which shall be attached to the petition.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1551, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2)(a)(I) R&RE and (2)(a)(I.1) added, p. 412, §§ 4, 5, effective June 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1108, § 1, effective March 1; (2)(f) amended, p. 1083, § 2, effective July 1, 1986.

L. 86:

(2)(d.1) added, p. 1030, § 14, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 87:

(2)(a)(VIII) added, p. 1232, § 2, effective May 13.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 786, § 10, effective June 4.

L. 92:

(2)(f) amended, p. 875, § 107, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(h) added, p. 1439, § 134, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 470, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(a)(IX) added, p. 1035, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(2)(a)(X) added, p. 1189, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1065), ch. 73, p. 232, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2)(a)(XI) added, (HB 19-1052), ch. 72, p. 259, § 5, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-302. Bond of petitioners.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on said petition, a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the court, or a cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the special district is not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the court is satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days distant, and upon failure of the petitioner to execute or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1552, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-303. Court jurisdiction - transfer of file - judge not disqualified.

The district court sitting in or for any county in this state is vested with the jurisdiction to organize special districts which may be entirely within or partly within and partly without the judicial district in which said court is located. The court in and for the county in which the petition for the organization of a special district has been filed, for all purposes of this part 3 except as otherwise provided, shall thereafter maintain and have original and exclusive jurisdiction, coextensive with the boundaries of the special district and of the property proposed to be included in said special district or affected by said special district, without regard to the usual limits of its jurisdiction.

If any special district by any reason whatsoever subsequently becomes situated entirely without a judicial district, the court on its motion or upon motion of the board shall transfer the entire file pertaining to the special district to the district court of the judicial district in which the major portion of the special district is then located, and said district court then shall have full jurisdiction over the special district in accordance with this article as if the proceedings had originally been filed there.

No judge of the court wherein such petition is filed shall be disqualified to perform any duty imposed by this part 3 by reason of ownership of property within any proposed special district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1552, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-304. Notice of court hearing.

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-1-304.5, immediately after the filing of a petition, the court wherein the petition is filed, by order, shall fix a place and time, not less than twenty-one days nor more than forty-two days after the petition is filed, for hearing thereon. The clerk of the court shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition, the purposes and boundaries of the special district, and the time and place of hearing thereon. The clerk of the court shall also forthwith cause a copy of the notice to be sent by United States first-class mail or by electronic service using the e-filing system of the judicial department to the board of county commissioners of each of the several counties and to each party entitled to notice pursuant to section 32-1-206 (2). The notice must include a general description of the land contained within the boundaries of the proposed special district and information explaining methods and procedures for the filing of a petition for exclusion of territory pursuant to section 32-1-305 (3).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1553, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 786, § 11, effective June 4.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1189, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1142), ch. 66, p. 208, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For requirements for notice by publication, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24.

32-1-304.5. Court hearing not required - health service district - health assurance district.

If the petition for organization filed with the court pursuant to section 32-1-301 is for a health service district or health assurance district, the court shall not hold a hearing or provide notice pursuant to section 32-1-304. In lieu of holding a hearing, the court shall review the petition for a health service district or health assurance district and the additional information submitted to the court pursuant to section 32-1-301. In addition, the court shall review the findings of the board of county commissioners pursuant to section 32-1-205 or the findings of the court pursuant to section 32-1-206, as applicable.

The court shall complete the review of information required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within thirty calendar days of receipt of the petition for a health service district or health assurance district. Within such period, the court shall determine whether the persons proposing the petition have complied with all of the statutory requirements for proposing a special district and that the required number of taxpaying electors of the proposed special district have signed the petition.

If the court finds that the petition has not been signed and presented in conformity with this part 3, the court shall either dismiss said proceedings and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in the proportion it deems just and equitable or allow the petitioners an opportunity to correct any technical defects in the petition and refile the petition with the court. No appeal or other remedy shall lie from an order dismissing said proceedings. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition for similar improvements or for a similar special district, and the right to renew such proceedings is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

The court shall not accept or act upon petitions filed by an owner of any real property within a proposed health service district or health assurance district stating reasons why the property should not be included therein and requesting that the property be excluded therefrom.

If the court concludes that a petition for the organization of a health service district or health assurance district has been signed and presented in conformity with this part 3 and that the allegations of the petition are true, the court, by order duly entered of record, shall direct that the question of the organization of the special district be submitted at an election to be held for that purpose in accordance with the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. In such event, the provisions of section 32-1-305 (5), (6), and (7) shall apply to the election.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1189, § 8, effective July 1.

32-1-305. Court hearing - election - declaration of organization.

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-1-304.5, on the day fixed for the hearing provided in section 32-1-304 or at an adjournment thereof, the court shall first ascertain, from such evidence which may be adduced, that the required number of taxpaying electors of the proposed special district have signed the petition. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only those signatures obtained after the approval of the service plan pursuant to section 32-1-205 or 32-1-206 or after approval of the petition by the governing body of a municipality pursuant to section 32-1-205 shall be considered by the district court in making the evidentiary finding that the required number of taxpaying electors of the proposed special district have signed the petition in accordance with this subsection (1).

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-1-304.5, upon said hearing, if the court finds that the petition has not been signed and presented in conformity with this part 3, it shall dismiss said proceedings and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in the proportion it deems just and equitable. No appeal or other remedy shall lie from an order dismissing said proceedings. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition for similar improvements or for a similar special district, and the right so to renew such proceedings is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-1-304.5, anytime after the filing of the petition for the organization of a special district but no later than ten days before the day fixed for the hearing thereon, the owner of any real property within the proposed special district may file a petition with the court stating reasons why said property should not be included therein and requesting that said real property be excluded therefrom. The petition shall be duly verified and shall describe the property sought to be excluded. The court shall hear the petition and all objections thereto at the time of the hearing on the petition for organization and shall determine whether, in the best public interest, the property should be excluded or included in the proposed special district. The court shall exclude property located in any home rule municipality in respect to which a petition for exclusion has been filed by the municipality.

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-1-304.5, upon the hearing, if it appears that a petition for the organization of a special district has been signed and presented in conformity with this part 3 and that the allegations of the petition are true, the court, by order duly entered of record, shall direct that the question of the organization of the special district be submitted at an election to be held for that purpose in accordance with article 13.5 of title 1.

At such election the voter shall vote for or against the organization of the special district and for five electors of the district who shall constitute the board of the special district, if organized.

If a majority of the votes cast at said election are in favor of the organization and the court determines the election was held in accordance with article 13.5 of title 1, the court shall declare the special district organized and give the special district the corporate name designated in the petition, by which it shall thereafter be known in all proceedings, and designate the first board elected. Thereupon the special district shall be a quasi-municipal corporation and a political subdivision of the state of Colorado with all the powers thereof.

If an order is entered declaring the special district organized, such order shall be deemed final, and no appeal or other remedy shall lie therefrom. The entry of such order shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the special district against all persons except the state of Colorado in an action in the nature of quo warranto commenced by the attorney general within thirty-five days after entry of such order declaring such special district organized and not otherwise. The organization of said special district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this subsection (7).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1553, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4) amended, p. 876, § 108, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(6) amended, p. 1642, § 65, effective May 31.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1190, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(7) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 881, § 146, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4) and (6) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 783, § 81, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1065), ch. 73, p. 232, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(4) and (6) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 538, § 8, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-305.5. Organizational election - new special district - first directors.

In the order authorizing the election, the court shall name either the clerk and recorder of the county in which the district is to be or another eligible elector of the state as the designated election official responsible for the conducting of the election.

At the election, the eligible electors shall vote for or against the organization of the special district and for the members of the board who will serve if the special district is organized. The terms of office of the first directors shall be as follows:

In the case of a five-member board, two directors shall serve until they or their successors are elected and qualified at the next regular special district election occurring in any year following that in which the special district was organized, and three shall serve until they or their successors are elected and qualified at the second regular special district election after organization.

In the case of a seven-member board, three directors shall serve until they or their successors are elected and qualified at the next regular special district election occurring in any year following that in which the special district was organized, and four shall serve until they or their successors are elected and qualified at the second regular special district election after organization.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the basic term of office for directors, after the original terms provided in subsection (2) of this section, is four years.

The terms of office of the directors elected in the regular special district elections held in 2020 and 2022 are for three years.

A nomination for director to serve for either term may be made by self-nomination and acceptance form or letter, as provided in section 1-13.5-303, C.R.S., with the time and manner of filing such form or letter as directed in the order of the district court authorizing the election.

If, after the results of the election are certified, the court finds that a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of organization, the court shall proceed with the order establishing the special district and shall issue certificates of election for the directors elected.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 876, § 109, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 448, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2014:

(1) and (4) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 70, § 30, effective February 18.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1039), ch. 29, p. 331, § 4, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

32-1-306. Filing decree.

Within thirty days after the special district has been declared organized by the court, the special district shall transmit to the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties in which the special district or a part thereof extends certified copies of the findings and the order of the court organizing said special district. The same shall be recorded by the county clerk and recorder in each county as provided in section 32-1-105. A copy of the approved service plan of the district shall be delivered to each such county clerk and recorder, who shall retain the service plan as a public record for public inspection. In addition, a copy of the service plan, together with a copy of the court's findings and order, shall be filed with the division as provided in section 32-1-105, and a map of the special district shall be filed with the county assessor in each county in which the special district or a part thereof extends and with the division according to the standards of the division. On or before January 1, 2010, a special district shall file a current, accurate map of its boundaries with the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties in which the special district or a part thereof extends. A special district shall maintain a current, accurate map of its boundaries and shall provide for such map to be on file with the county assessor, the clerk and recorder, and the division on or before January 1 of each year.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1554, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1020, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1732, § 3, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning public records, see article 72 of title 24.

32-1-307. Park and recreation districts - metropolitan districts providing parks and recreational facilities or programs - exclusion proviso.

Any provision of this part 3 to the contrary notwithstanding, no tract of land of forty acres or more used primarily and zoned for agricultural uses shall be included in any park and recreation district or in any metropolitan district providing parks or recreational facilities and programs organized under this part 3 without the written consent of the owners thereof. No personal property which is situated upon real estate not included in such district shall be included within any park and recreation or metropolitan district. If, contrary to the provisions of this section, any such tract, parcel, or personal property is included in any park and recreation or metropolitan district, the owners thereof, on petition to the court, shall be entitled to have such property excluded from such district free and clear of any contract, obligation, lien, or charge to which it may be liable as a part of such district.

If the use or zoning of any tract of land of forty acres or more lying within the boundaries of any park and recreation district or any metropolitan district providing parks or recreational facilities and programs organized under the provisions of this part 3 has been or is changed from agricultural use or zoning to any other use or zoning designation, such lands and the personal property thereon shall no longer be excluded from said district and shall be subject to all obligations, liens, or charges of such district on and after January 1 of the year following such change in use or zoning.

When there is a change of use or zoning to any other use or zoning designation and the assessor of the county in which such lands are located is notified of a change, he shall give notification of such change to the secretary of the district. The district shall mail a notice of such action to the owner of the property at the address shown for such owner in the records of the county assessor's office.

The district shall petition the appropriate district court for an order including the subject lands within the district, and the court, upon examining the proof of change of such use or zoning and finding that it complies with this section, shall enter an order including said lands within the district. The district shall have a certified copy of said order recorded by the county clerk and recorder and shall file a copy with the county assessor.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1554, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 17-1065), ch. 73, p. 231, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-2-108 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-308. Applicability of article to existing districts and validation - districts being organized.

The provisions of this article which become effective July 1, 1981, shall apply to all special districts existing on June 30, 1981, or organized thereafter; except that any such existing district need not obtain a name change to conform to this article and that any district may continue to operate for the purpose or purposes for which it was organized.

Any proceedings for the organization of a special district which were commenced prior to July 1, 1981, may continue pursuant to the laws in effect at the time such organization was commenced until the district court has declared the district organized. Thereafter, the special district shall be subject to the provisions of this article. Any such organizational proceedings which are dismissed by the board of county commissioners or by the district court and which are recommenced after July 1, 1981, shall be governed by the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1555, § 1, effective July 1.